California statutes. Civil Code
(2) Using obscene, profane, or abusive language.

(3) Causing a telephone to ring, or engaging any person in telephone conversation repeatedly or continuously with intent to annoy, abuse, or harass any person.

(4) Placing telephone calls without disclosure of the caller’s
 identity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.639.

A lessor shall not engage in any unfair, unlawful, or deceptive conduct or make any untrue or misleading statement in connection with a rental-purchase agreement, including any violation of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.640.

A lessor shall not report any late payment, default, or repossession to a consumer credit reporting agency, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1785.3, or to an investigative consumer reporting agency, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1786.2 if the lessor (a) advertises “no credit check” or otherwise states or implies that no inquiry will be made of a consumer’s credit history or creditworthiness or (b) does not obtain a consumer credit report or investigative consumer report on a consumer before entering into a rental-purchase agreement with that
 consumer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.641.

(a) A lessor shall not send any solicitation or other promotional material to a person identified by the consumer as a reference to verify the consumer’s income, assets, credit history, or residence unless all of the following occur:

(1) The lessor clearly discloses in the rental-purchase agreement or application that (A) the lessor may send solicitations or other promotional material to references provided by the consumer unless the consumer objects and (B) the consumer has
 the right to object without incurring any additional rental charge or fee or any loss of contractual rights.

(2) A space on the rental-purchase agreement or application adjacent to the disclosure described in paragraph (1) is provided for the consumer to indicate the consumer’s approval or disapproval of the lessor’s sending solicitations or other promotional material.

(3) The consumer affirmatively indicates approval.

(4) The lessor does not vary any term required to be disclosed pursuant to Section 1812.623 depending on whether the consumer approves or disapproves of the lessor’s sending of solicitations or other promotional material to references.

(b) The first solicitation or other promotional material directed to a person whom the consumer has
 identified as a reference shall clearly offer the reference the opportunity, without cost, to instruct the lessor to refrain from sending further solicitations or other promotional material to the reference. If so instructed, the lessor shall not send any further solicitations or other promotional material to the reference and shall remove the reference’s name and address from the lessor’s mailing list.

(c) This section shall not apply to solicitations or other promotional material sent generally to people solely on the basis of demographic, geographic, or postal zip code criteria and without regard to whether the people have been identified as references by consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.642.

A lessor shall not discriminate against a prospective consumer on any ground that would be a prohibited basis for a creditor to discriminate against an applicant for credit as provided in the Equal Credit Opportunity Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1691 et seq.) and Regulation B (12 C.F.R. Part 202) as if they applied to a rental-purchase agreement. Nothing in this section shall be construed in any manner to mean that a rental-purchase agreement is a credit transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.643.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a lessor who obtains the signature of more than one person on a rental-purchase agreement shall deliver the notice set forth in subdivision (c) to each person before that person signs the agreement.

(b) This section does not apply if the persons signing the agreement are married to each other or in fact receive possession of the property described in the agreement.

(c) The notice required by this section is as follows:

“NOTICE TO COSIGNER

If you sign this contract, you will have the same responsibility for the property and the same obligation to make payments that every renter has.

If any renter does not pay, you may have to pay the full amount owed, including late fees, and you may have to pay for certain loss or damage to the property.

The lessor may collect from you without first trying to collect from any other renter. The lessor can use the same collection methods against you that can be used against any renter, such as suing you or garnishing your wages.

This notice is not the contract that makes you responsible.

Before you sign, be sure you can afford to pay if you have to, and that you
 want to accept this responsibility.”

(d) The notice required by subdivision (c) shall be printed in at least 10-point boldface type in English and Spanish. If the rental-purchase agreement is required to be written in a language other than English or Spanish, the notice shall be written in English and, in addition or in lieu of Spanish, in that other language.

(e) If the notice set forth in subdivision (c) is included with the text of the rental-purchase agreement, the notice shall appear immediately above or adjacent to the disclosures required by subdivision (b) of Section 1812.623. If the notice is not included with the text of the agreement, the notice shall be on a separate sheet which shall not contain any other text except as is necessary to identify the lessor and agreement to which the notice refers and to provide for the date and the person’s acknowledgment of
 receipt.

(f) The lessor shall give each person entitled to notice under this section a copy of the completed rental-purchase agreement before obtaining that person’s signature.

(g) If a person entitled to receive notice and a copy of the rental-purchase agreement under this section does not receive the notice or agreement in the manner required, that person has no liability in connection with the rental-purchase transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.644.

(a) A lessor shall maintain records that establish the lessor’s cost, as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 1812.622, for each item of personal property that is the subject of the rental-purchase agreement. A copy of each rental-purchase agreement and of the records required by this subdivision shall be maintained for two years following the termination of the agreement.

(b) The maximum cash price for the lessor’s first rental of the property that is the subject of the
 rental-purchase agreement may not exceed 1.65 times the lessor’s cost for computer systems and appliances, 1.7 times the lessor’s cost for electronic sets, 1.9 times the lessor’s cost for automotive accessories, furniture, jewelry, and musical instruments, and 1.65 times the lessor’s cost for all other items.

(c) The maximum total of payments may not exceed 2.25 times the maximum cash price that could have been charged for the first rental of the property under subdivision (b).

(d) The maximum total of payments for the lessor’s second and subsequent rental of the property that is the subject of the rental-purchase agreement may not exceed the maximum total of payments permitted under subdivision (c) for the first rental of that property less (1) for appliances and electronic sets, one-third the amount of all rental payments paid to the lessor by consumers who previously rented
 that property or (2) for furniture, computer systems, and all other items, one-half the amount of all rental payments paid to the lessor by consumers who previously rented that property.

(e) The maximum cash price for property on its second or subsequent rental may not exceed the maximum total of payments for that property as permitted under subdivision (d) divided by 2.25.

(f) Upon the written request of the Attorney General, any district attorney or city attorney, or the Director of the Department of Consumer Affairs, a lessor shall provide copies of the records described in this section.

(g) If a lessor willfully discloses a cash price or a total of payments that exceeds the amount permitted by this section, the rental-purchase agreement is void, the consumer shall retain the property without any obligation, and
 the lessor shall refund to the consumer all amounts paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 410, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.645.

An action on a rental-purchase agreement shall be tried in the county in which the rental-purchase agreement was signed or the consumer resides at the time the action is commenced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.646.

Any waiver or modification of the provisions of this title by the consumer or lessor shall be void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.647.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.648.

The rights, remedies, and penalties established by this title are cumulative to the rights, remedies, or penalties established under other laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.649.

If any provision of this title or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the title that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1026, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.650.

(a) A lessor shall provide clear and prominent notice to a consumer and obtain express consent from the consumer at the time the lessor and the consumer enter into a rental-purchase agreement for an electronic device if that device has geophysical location tracking technology installed by the lessor, and at any time the geophysical location tracking technology is activated or used by the lessor.

(b) For purposes of this section, “clear and prominent notice” means notice presented in an understandable language and syntax, in the predominantly used language for that communication, and that: 

(1) In textual communications, the required disclosures are separate and apart from a privacy policy, data use policy, terms of service, end-user license agreement, lease agreement, or other similar document, and of a type, size, and location sufficiently noticeable for an ordinary consumer to read and comprehend in print that contrasts highly with the background on which they appear.

(2) In communications disseminated orally or through audible means, the required disclosures are unavoidable and delivered in a volume and cadence sufficient for an ordinary consumer to hear and comprehend.

(3) In communications
 disseminated through video means, the required disclosures are in writing in a form consistent with paragraph (1) and appear on the screen for a duration sufficient for an ordinary consumer to read and comprehend them.

(4) In communications made through interactive media, including the Internet, online services, and software, the required disclosures are unavoidable and presented in a form consistent with paragraph (1), in addition to any audio or video presentation. 

(c) A lessor shall not use, sell, or share geophysical location tracking technology on an electronic device for any purpose other than the repossession of the electronic device when there is a violation of the rental-purchase agreement, pursuant to law, or when requested by the consumer.

(d) Clear and prominent notification shall be displayed on an
 electronic device if geophysical location tracking technology is activated or used by the lessor. This notification requirement shall be suspended if the consumer or lessor reports that the electronic device has been stolen and has filed a police report stating that the electronic device has been stolen. For purposes of this subdivision, “filing a police report” means the filing of a consumer’s or lessor’s complaint with the police department in any form recognized by that jurisdiction.

(e) A lessor shall provide that any geophysical location tracking technology that has been installed by the lessor on an electronic device, or can be activated by the lessor, expires upon the first instance the electronic device connects to the Internet after completion of the purchase of the electronic device.

(f) A lessor shall not use or install monitoring technology on an electronic device for
 any purpose other than to provide remote technical assistance when requested by the consumer.

(g) A lessor shall provide clear and prominent notice to a consumer and obtain express consent from the consumer for the installation or use of any software that allows the lessor to provide remote technical assistance and upon the activation and deactivation of any remote technical assistance when requested by the consumer.

(h) A lessor shall not acquire any data when providing remote technical assistance beyond what is necessary to provide assistance to the user and beyond what the user has consented to. Any data acquired during the period of consumer consented technical assistance shall not be retained, used, or sold for any purpose.

(i) This section shall not be interpreted to require a lessor to enter into a
 rental-purchase agreement with any consumer who does not provide express consent to the above-described provisions of the rental-purchase agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 426, Sec. 2.   (AB 2667)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2.97. CONSUMER COLLECTION NOTICE [1812.700. - 1812.702.]

1812.700.

(a) In addition to the requirements imposed by Article 2 (commencing with Section 1788.10) of Title 1.6C, third-party debt collectors subject to the federal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692 et seq.) shall provide a notice to debtors that shall include the following description of debtor rights:
“The state Rosenthal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act and the federal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act require that, except
 under unusual circumstances, collectors may not contact you before 8 a.m. or after 9 p.m. They may not harass you by using threats of violence or arrest or by using obscene language. Collectors may not use false or misleading statements or call you at work if they know or have reason to know that you may not receive personal calls at work. For the most part, collectors may not tell another person, other than your attorney or spouse, about your debt. Collectors may contact another person to confirm your location or enforce a judgment. For more information about debt collection activities, you may contact the Federal Trade Commission at 1-877-FTC-HELP or www.ftc.gov.”

(b) The notice shall be included with the first written notice initially addressed to a California address of a debtor in connection with collecting the debt by the third-party debt collector.

(c) If a language
 other than English is principally used by the third-party debt collector in the initial oral contact with the debtor, a notice shall be provided to the debtor in that language within five working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 259.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.701.

(a) The notice required in this title may be changed only as necessary to reflect changes under the federal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692 et seq.) that would otherwise make the disclosure inaccurate.

(b) The type-size used in the disclosure shall be at least the same type-size as that used to inform the debtor of his or her specific debt, but is not required to be larger than 12-point type.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.702.

Any violation of this act shall be considered a violation of the Rosenthal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act (Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Operative July 1, 2004, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 259.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 3. DEPOSIT [1813. - 1881.2.]



  CHAPTER 1. Deposit in General [1813. - 1828.]



  ARTICLE 1. Nature and Creation of Deposit [1813. - 1818.]

1813.

A deposit may be voluntary or involuntary; and for safe keeping or for exchange.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1814.

A voluntary deposit is made by one giving to another, with his consent, the possession of personal property to keep for the benefit of the former, or of a third party. The person giving is called the depositor, and the person receiving the depositary.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1815.

An involuntary deposit is made:

(a) By the accidental leaving or placing of personal property in the possession of any person, without negligence on the part of its owner.

(b) In cases of fire, shipwreck, inundation, insurrection, riot, or like extraordinary emergencies, by the owner of personal property committing it, out of necessity, to the care of any person.

(c) By the delivery to, or picking up by, and the holding of, a stray live animal by any person or public or private entity.

(d) By the abandonment or leaving of a live animal, as proscribed by Section 597.1 of the Penal Code, in or about any premises or real property that has been vacated upon, or immediately preceding, the termination of a lease or other rental agreement or foreclosure of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1816.

(a) The person or private entity with whom a thing is deposited in the manner described in Section 1815 is bound to take charge of it, if able to do so.

(b) Any person or private entity with whom a live animal is deposited in the manner described in subdivision (d) of Section 1815 shall immediately notify animal control officials for the purpose of retrieving the animal pursuant to Section 597.1 of the Penal Code. Animal control officers who respond shall be entitled to
 exercise the right afforded them pursuant to that section to secure a lien for the purpose of recovering the costs of attempting to rescue the animal. Nothing in this subdivision shall impose any new or additional civil or criminal liability upon a depositary who complies with this subdivision.

(c) A public agency or shelter with whom an abandoned animal is deposited in the manner described in Section 1815 is bound to take charge of it, as provided in Section 597.1 of the Penal Code.

(d) The person in possession of the abandoned animal is subject to all local ordinances and state laws that govern the proper care and treatment of those animals.

(e) For purposes of this section, the person or private entity that notifies animal control officials to retrieve the animal or the successor property owner shall not be
 considered the keeper of the animal or the agent of the animal’s owner as those terms are used in Section 597.1 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 265, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1817.

A deposit for keeping is one in which the depositary is bound to return the identical thing deposited.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1818.

A deposit for exchange is one in which the depositary is only bound to return a thing corresponding in kind to that which is deposited.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Obligations of the Depositary [1822. - 1828.]

1822.

A depositary must deliver the thing to the person for whose benefit it was deposited, on demand, whether the deposit was made for a specified time or not, unless he has a lien upon the thing deposited, or has been forbidden or prevented from doing so by the real owner thereof, or by the act of the law, and has given the notice required by Section 1825.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1823.

A depositary is not bound to deliver a thing deposited without demand, even where the deposit is made for a specified time.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1824.

A depositary must deliver the thing deposited at his residence or place of business, as may be most convenient for him.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1825.

A depositary must give prompt notice to the person for whose benefit the deposit was made, of any proceedings taken adversely to his interest in the thing deposited, which may tend to excuse the depositary from delivering the thing to him.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1826.

A depositary, who believes that a thing deposited with him is wrongfully detained from its true owner, may give him notice of the deposit; and if within a reasonable time afterwards he does not claim it, and sufficiently establish his right thereto, and indemnify the depositary against the claim of the depositor, the depositary is exonerated from liability to the person to whom he gave the notice, upon returning the thing to the depositor, or assuming, in good faith, a new obligation changing his position in respect to the thing, to his prejudice.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1827.

If a thing deposited is owned jointly or in common by persons who cannot agree upon the manner of its delivery, the depositary may deliver to each his proper share thereof, if it can be done without injury to the thing.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1828.

When a deposit is made in the name of two or more persons, deliverable or payable to either or to their survivor or survivors, such deposit or any part thereof, or increase thereof, may be delivered or paid to either of said persons or to the survivor or survivors in due course of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1907, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Deposit for Keeping [1833. - 1867.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1833. - [1840.]]

1833.

A depositor must indemnify the depositary:

1. For all damage caused to him by the defects or vices of the thing deposited; and,

2. For all expenses necessarily incurred by him about the thing, other than such as are involved in the nature of the undertaking.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.

A depositary of living animals shall provide the animals with necessary and prompt veterinary care, nutrition, and shelter, and treat them kindly. Any depositary that fails to perform these duties may be liable for civil damages as provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.4.

(a) It is the policy of the state that no adoptable animal should be euthanized if it can be adopted into a suitable home. Adoptable animals include only those animals eight weeks of age or older that, at or subsequent to the time the animal is impounded or otherwise taken into possession, have manifested no sign of a behavioral or temperamental defect that could pose a health or safety risk or otherwise make the animal unsuitable for placement as a pet, and have manifested no sign of disease, injury, or congenital or hereditary
 condition that adversely affects the health of the animal or that is likely to adversely affect the animal’s health in the future.

(b) It is the policy of the state that no treatable animal should be euthanized. A treatable animal shall include any animal that is not adoptable but that could become adoptable with reasonable efforts. This subdivision, by itself, shall not be the basis of liability for damages regarding euthanasia.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 752, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever an animal is delivered to a veterinarian, dog kennel, cat kennel, pet-grooming parlor, animal hospital, or any other animal care facility pursuant to a written or oral agreement entered into after the effective date of this section, and the owner of the animal does not pick up the animal within 14 calendar days after the day the animal was
 initially due to be picked up, the animal shall be deemed to be abandoned. The person into whose custody the animal was placed for care shall first try for a period of not less than 10 days to find a new owner for the animal or turn the animal over to a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or nonprofit animal rescue group, provided that the shelter or rescue group has been contacted and has agreed to take the animal. If unable to place the animal with a new owner, shelter, or rescue group, the animal care facility may have the abandoned animal euthanized.

(b) If an animal so abandoned was left with a veterinarian or with a facility that has a veterinarian, and a new owner cannot be found pursuant to this section, the veterinarian may euthanize the animal.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be
 construed to require an animal care facility or a veterinarian to euthanize an abandoned animal upon the expiration of the 10-day period described in subdivision (a).

(d) There shall be a notice posted in a conspicuous place, or in conspicuous type in a written receipt given, to warn a person depositing an animal at an animal care facility of the provisions of this section.

(e) An abandoned animal shall not be used for scientific or any other type of experimentation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 86, Sec. 1.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.7.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Animal dealer” means a person who, in commerce, for compensation or profit, delivers for transportation, or transports, except as a carrier, or who buys, sells, or negotiates the purchase or sale of any animal, whether alive or dead, for research, teaching, exhibition, or biological supply.

(2) “Animal shelter entity” includes, but is not limited to, an animal regulation agency, humane society, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or other private or public animal shelter.

(3) “Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, limited liability company, joint-stock company, corporation, association, trust, estate, governmental agency, or other legal entity.

(4) “Research facility” means a research facility as defined by Section 2132 of Title 7 of the United States Code, effective February 7, 2014.

(b) (1) An animal shelter entity where dead animals are turned over to a biological supply facility or a research facility for research purposes or to supply blood, tissue, or other biological products shall post a
 sign as described by this paragraph in a place where it will be clearly visible to a majority of persons when turning animals over to the shelter. The sign shall measure a minimum of 28x21 cm— 11x812 inches —with lettering of a minimum of 3.2 cm high and 1.2 cm wide— 114x12 inch —(91 point) and shall state:
“Animals Euthanized at This Shelter May Be Used for Research Purposes or to Supply Blood, Tissue, or Other Biological Products”

(2) The statement in paragraph (1) shall also be included on owner surrender forms.

(3) An animal shelter or other person shall not euthanize an animal for the purpose of transferring the carcass to a research facility or animal dealer. 

(c) (1) An animal shelter entity or other person that accepts animals from the public or takes in stray or unwanted animals shall not sell, give, or otherwise transfer a living animal to a research facility, an animal dealer, or other person for the purpose of research, experimentation, or testing.

(2) A research facility, animal dealer, or other person shall not procure, purchase, receive, accept, or use a living animal for the purpose of research, experimentation, or testing if that animal is transferred from, or received from, an animal shelter
 entity or other person that accepts animals from the public or takes in stray or unwanted animals.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a research facility from working in collaboration with an animal shelter to investigate problems and provide services to shelter animals.

(e) A violation of this section is subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) in an action to be brought by the district attorney or city attorney of the county or city where the violation occurred. When collected, the civil penalty shall be payable to the general fund of the governmental entity that brought the action to assess the penalty.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 568, Sec. 2.   (AB 2269)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.8.

(a) At any public auction or sale where equines are sold, the management of the auction or sale shall post a sign (measuring a minimum of 15x9 inches with lettering of a minimum of 114x12 (91 point)) or shall insert into its consignment agreement with the seller in boldface type the notice stated in subdivision (b). If a sign is posted, it shall be posted in a conspicuous place so that it will be clearly visible to a majority of persons
 attending the sale. If the notice is inserted into the consignment agreement, space shall be provided adjacent to the notice for the seller to initial their acknowledgment of the notice.

(b) The notice required by subdivision (a) shall read as follows:

“WARNING 

The sale of horses in California for slaughter for human consumption is a felony.”
(c) For the purposes of this section, the management of the auction or sale shall post current slaughter prices or make them available to sellers upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 765, Sec. 2.   (AB 128)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.9.

(a) Manufacturers and contract testing facilities shall not use traditional animal test methods within this state for which an appropriate alternative test method or strategy exists, or a waiver has been granted by the agency responsible for regulating the specific product or activity for which the test is being conducted. When there is no appropriate alternative test method or strategy
 available, manufacturers and contract testing facilities shall use a traditional animal test method using the fewest number of animals possible and reducing the level of pain, suffering, and stress of an animal used for testing.

(b) This section does not prohibit the use of any nonanimal test method or strategy for the testing of any product, product formulation, chemical, drug, medical device, vaccine, or ingredient that is not described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).

(c) (1) This section does not prohibit the use of traditional
 animal test methods to comply with requirements of state or federal agencies.

(2) This section does not prohibit the use of traditional animal test methods to comply with requests from state or federal agencies when the agency has approved an alternative nonanimal test method or strategy pursuant to subdivision (a), but concludes that a traditional animal test method is needed to fully assess the impacts on the health or safety of consumers.

(d) This section shall be enforced in a civil action for injunctive
 relief brought by the Attorney General, the district attorney of the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred, or a city attorney of a city or a city and county having a population in excess of 750,000 and in which the violation is alleged to have occurred. If the court determines that the Attorney General or district attorney is the prevailing party in the enforcement action, the official may also recover costs, attorney’s fees, and a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in that action.

(e) This section shall not apply to any traditional animal test methods performed for the purpose of medical research.

(f) (1) Starting January 1,
 2027, and annually thereafter, a manufacturer or contract testing facility in this state using traditional animal test
 methods, except for those traditional animal test methods exempt under subdivision (e), shall report to the department the number and species of animals used, the type and number of alternative test methods or strategies used, the number of waivers used, and the purpose of the use of the traditional animal tests, alternative test methods or strategies, and waivers.

(2) The department shall develop and maintain a portal on its internet website to receive the information required by paragraph (1) and make the information collected publicly available on its internet website. The department shall ensure that information made available to the public does not include personally identifiable information or proprietary information.

(g) For the purposes of this section, the
 following terms apply:

(1) “Alternative test method or strategy” means a test method, including a new or revised method, that fulfills all of the following criteria:

(A) Does not use animals. 

(B) Provides information of equivalent or better scientific quality and relevance compared to traditional animal test methods, and includes, but is not limited to, computational toxicology and bioinformatics, high-throughput screening methods, testing of categories of chemical substances, tiered testing methods, in vitro studies, and systems biology.

(C) Has been identified and accepted for use by a federal agency or program within an agency responsible for regulating
 the specific product or activity for which the test is being conducted.

(2) “Animal” means vertebrate nonhuman animal. 

(3) “Contract testing facility” means any partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that tests chemicals, ingredients, product formulations, or products in this state. 

(4) “Department” means the State Department of Public Health.

(5) “Manufacturer” means any partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that produces chemicals, ingredients, product formulations, or products in this state.

(6) “Medical research” means research
 related to the causes, diagnosis, treatment, control, or prevention of physical or mental diseases and impairments of humans and animals or related to the development of biomedical products, devices, or drugs as defined in Section 321(g)(1) of Title 21 of the United States Code. Medical research does not include the testing of an ingredient that was formerly used in a drug, tested for the drug use with traditional animal methods to characterize the ingredient and to substantiate its safety for human use, and is now proposed for use in a product other than a biomedical product, medical device, or drug. 

(7) “Person” means an individual with managerial control, or a partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship.

(8) “Traditional animal test method” means a process or procedure
 using animals to obtain information on the characteristics of a chemical or agent and that generates information regarding the ability of a chemical or agent to produce a specific biological effect under specified conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 430, Sec. 1.   (AB 357)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.9.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Alternative test method” means a test method that does not use animals, or in some cases reduces or refines the use of animals, for which the reliability and relevance for a specific purpose has been established by validation bodies, including, but not limited to, the Interagency Coordinating Committee for the Validation of Alternative Methods and the Organization for Economic Co-operation and Development. Alternative test methods include, but are not limited to, high-throughput screening methods, testing of categories of chemical substances, tiered testing methods, in vitro studies, and
 systems biology.

(2) “Canine or feline toxicological experiment” means any test or study of any duration that seeks to determine the effect, if any, of the application or exposure, whether internal or external, of any amount of a chemical substance on a dog or cat. “Application or exposure” includes, but is not limited to, oral ingestion, skin or eye contact, or inhalation.

(3) “Cat” means any member of the species Felis catus.

(4) “Chemical substance” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined under
 subsection (2) of Section 2602 of Title 15 of the United States Code, except that for purposes of this section, such term shall include any pesticide, as defined under subsection (u) of Section 136 of Title 7 of the United States Code, and any food additive, as defined under subsection (s) of Section 321 of
 Title 21 of the United States Code.

(5) “Dog” means any member of the species Canis familiaris.

(6) “Food additive” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in subsection (s) of Section 321 of Title 21 of the United States Code.

(7) “Medical research” means research related to the causes, diagnosis, treatment, control, or prevention of physical or mental diseases and impairments of humans and animals or related to the development of biomedical drugs or devices as those terms
 are defined in subsections (g) and (h), inclusive, of Section 321 of Title 21 of the United States Code. Medical research does not include experimentation or testing of a chemical substance or ingredient proposed for use in a product other than a biomedical drug or device as those terms are defined in the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 321).

(8) “Pesticide” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in
 subsection (u) of Section 136 of Title 7 of the United States Code.

(9) “Testing facility” means any partnership, corporation, association, school, institution, organization, or other legal relationship, whether privately or government owned, leased, or operated, that tests chemicals, ingredients, product formulations, or products in this state.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, and in addition to the prohibitions set forth in Sections 1834.9 and 1834.9.5, a testing facility shall not conduct a